Alabama, session 2026rs, HB550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Poultry Export Stabilization and Market Access Act.
Section 2. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Agriculture and
Industries.
(2) ELIGIBLE ENTITY. A poultry producer, processor, or
exporter operating within the state.
(3) TRADE DISRUPTION. The loss of market access,
increased export costs, or reduced competitiveness caused by
foreign tariffs, sanitary regulations, or geopolitical
restrictions.
Section 3. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish a
Poultry Export Recovery Grant Program to provide direct
financial assistance to eligible entities.
(b) Grants shall support operational continuity,
product redirection, employee retention, and loss and trade
Page 2

product redirection, employee retention, and loss and trade
HB550 INTRODUCED
disruption mitigation.
(c) The department shall prioritize applicants
demonstrating recent trade losses directly linked to foreign
tariffs or embargoes.
Section 4. (a) The department shall assist poultry
exporters in identifying and entering new international
markets.
(b) Support may include:
(1) Participation in state-led trade missions;
(2) Developing foreign marketing materials; and
(3) Assisting with international health and safety
certification.
(c) Priority shall be given to small and mid-sized
exporters.
Section 5. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, a capital investment fund is
established for:
(1) Cold storage facilities;
(2) Refrigerated transport vehicles; and
(3) Export-focused logistics hubs.
(b) Grants or low-interest loans may be awarded to
eligible entities or local governments engaged in poultry
export infrastructure projects.
Section 6. (a) The state shall expand in-state demand
for poultry products through:
(1) Preferential purchasing in public institutions and
school meal programs;
(2) In-state marketing and public awareness campaigns;
Page 3

(2) In-state marketing and public awareness campaigns;
HB550 INTRODUCED
and
(3) Price stabilization contracts during periods of
international market downturn.
(b) On request, a state agency shall provide assistance
to the department in implementing this section.
Section 7. (a) The Poultry Trade Risk Monitoring Task
Force is established to do all of the following:
(1) Track developments in global poultry trade policy;
(2) Assess vulnerabilities and economic risks to the
poultry sector; and
(3) Advise the executive and legislative branches on
adaptive policy measures.
(b) The task force shall consist of nine individuals
that represent the poultry associations, poultry exporters,
academic experts, and all relevant state agencies. The
100 Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
101 President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall each appoint 3
102 members of the task force.
103 (c) The chair of the task force, as designated by the
104 Governor from among his or her appointees, shall call the
105 first meeting of the task force which shall be not later than
106 January 1, 2027.
107 (d) The task force shall annually submit a report of
108 its findings, conclusions, and recommendations for any
109 proposed legislation to the Governor, Speaker of the House of
110 Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
111 not later than the first legislative day of each regular
112 legislative session.
Page 4

legislative session.
HB550 INTRODUCED
113 (e)(1) The legislative members of the task force, if
114 any, shall be entitled to their legislative compensation, per
115 diem, and travel expenses for each day they attend a meeting
116 of the task force pursuant to Section 49 of the Constitution
117 of Alabama of 2022.
118 (2) The nonlegislative members of the task force shall
119 serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary
120 expenses in attending meetings of the task force pursuant to
121 the policies of their appointing authority.
122 Section 8. This act shall become effective on July 1,
123 2027.
Page 5